Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2466XS (3) 91 ss/ko S.F. 240 Section 1. Section 22.7, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 1 following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 76. Records relating to the investigation 3 and remediation of an infraction at a compounding facility 4 engaging in the compounding of nonsterile preparations as 5 provided in section 155A.15A. 6 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 155A.15A Compounding facilities ââ 7 inspections ââ penalties. 8 1. a. If an inspector employed by the board discovers 9 during the course of an inspection that a compounding facility 10 engaging in the compounding of nonsterile preparations is 11 out of compliance with the requirements of United States 12 pharmacopeia general chapter 795, the inspector shall notify 13 the pharmacist in charge of the compounding facility of the 14 infraction that the pharmacist in charge must correct. 15 b. If an inspector employed by the board discovers 16 during the course of an inspection conducted not less than 17 thirty days, or more than ninety days, after the date of an 18 inspection described in paragraph âaâ that the infraction 19 identified pursuant to paragraph âaâ has not been corrected, 20 the inspector shall provide comprehensive instruction regarding 21 the infraction and the correction of the infraction to the 22 pharmacist in charge. 23 c. If an inspector employed by the board discovers during 24 the course of an inspection conducted not less than thirty 25 days, or more than ninety days, after an inspection described 26 in paragraph âbâ that the infraction identified pursuant to 27 paragraph âaâ has not been corrected, the inspector shall 28 prescribe mandatory education for the pharmacist in charge for 29 the correction of the infraction. 30 2. If a compounding facility engaging in the compounding 31 of nonsterile preparations does not correct an infraction as 32 provided in subsection 1, the board may impose a single fine 33 not to exceed five hundred dollars, which shall be adjusted 34 for inflation, as defined in section 668.15A, by the board by 35 -1- LSB 2466XS (3) 91 ss/ko 1/ 2 S.F. 240 rule on January 1 of each even-numbered year. The board shall 1 not impose any other fine or remedy for a violation of this 2 section. This subsection shall not affect damages available in 3 tort, contract, or otherwise for a violation of this section. 4